Washington statutes.
RCW 6.23.100

Restraining waste during redemption period.

Until the expiration of the time allowed for redemption, the court may restrain the commission of waste on the property. But it is not waste for the person in possession of the property at the time of the sale or entitled to possession afterwards during the period allowed for redemption to continue to use it in the same manner in which it was previously used, or to use it in the ordinary course of husbandry, or to make the necessary repairs of buildings thereon, or to use wood or timber on the property therefor, or for the repairs of fences, or for fuel in his or her family while occupying the property.

[ 1987 c 442 s 710; 1899 c 53 s 14; RRS s 601. Formerly RCW 6.24.200.]